Washington statutes.
RCW 26.18.010

Legislative findings.

The legislature finds that there is an urgent need for vigorous enforcement of child support and maintenance obligations, and that stronger and more efficient statutory remedies need to be established to supplement and complement the remedies provided in chapters 26.09, 26.21A, 26.26A, 26.26B, 74.20, and 74.20A RCW.

[ 2019 c 46 s 5024; 2008 c 6 s 1026; 1993 c 426 s 1; 1984 c 260 s 1.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.